New York, session 2025-2026, S3111.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 807-e 2 to read as follows: 3 § 807-e. Fire department recruitment. The principal of any high school 4 may allow any local fire department, upon request, to enter the school 5 for the purpose of fire department junior recruitment, including, but 6 not limited to: making presentations; disseminating literature; and 7 answering questions by students. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 9 the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07188-01-5